Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8916
Department; waiver of requirements.

The department may waive requirements under sections 71-8912 to 71-8915 upon proof satisfactory to the department that such requirements are duplicative of other requirements of Nebraska laws, rules, or regulations and that the granting of such waiver will not endanger the public safety.

Laws 2008, LB1022, § 16.